Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 63. Consumer Protection

Particular cases.

There was sufficient evidence to support a judgment in favor of plaintiffs in a suit under the Consumer Protection Act based on a misrepresentation or omission of material fact, as a fact-finder could reasonably infer that defendant agreed to the sale of a demonstrator modular home while harboring an unstated intention not to consummate it, but rather to persuade plaintiffs later to take a different, newly manufactured model. McKinstry v. Fecteau Residential Homes, 2015 VT 125, 200 Vt. 392, 131 A.3d 1123, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 101 (2015).

In an action under the Consumer Protection Act, the trial court did not err in awarding an attorney’s fee less than sought by plaintiffs, as it considered the result obtained by plaintiffs versus the recovery they sought, and did not err in finding that plaintiffs had not shown a pattern of socially irresponsible behavior on the part of defendant. McKinstry v. Fecteau Residential Homes, 2015 VT 125, 200 Vt. 392, 131 A.3d 1123, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 101 (2015).

Trial court erred by offsetting the deposit refunded by defendant against the attorney’s fees awarded to plaintiffs, as the return of the deposit had nothing to do with plaintiffs’ claim that defendant violated the Consumer Protection Act. McKinstry v. Fecteau Residential Homes, 2015 VT 125, 200 Vt. 392, 131 A.3d 1123, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 101 (2015).